GRINNELL COLLEGE
SCARLET 8: BLACK
THE STUDENT
NEWSPAPER
 
Vol. LXXV!
Grinnell. Iowa, Friday. May lb, 1959
No. 23
 
To Seniors:
EVENING
Slowly now the evening changes his payments
held for him by a rim of ancient trees,-
you game: and the landscape divided and leaves you,
one linking and one rising toward the sky.
And you are left, to none beginning wholly,
not so dark as a silent house, nor quite
so surely pleased unto eternity
as that which grows to star and crimes the night.
To you is left (unspeakably confused)
your life, atlantic, pipeline, full of tears,
so that it, now helped in, now wrapping all,
is changed in you by turns to stone and stars
vRilke
know by lulu x...
 
Page Two
SCARLET AND BLACK
Friday. May lb, lm
__M
DITORIALS
situated Educational Requirements Need Updating
As the facility list of the class of ’69 increases with each additional “unacceptable fulfillment” (according to the faculty),
of various requirements, we find our respect for the highly valued
Grinnell degree and our faith in the meaning of a liberal education shattered. it is reasonable to expect that the college will
establish certain criteria that must be met before one can receive
a diploma, which is supposed to signing some level of meaningful
accomplishment. If the college expects the diploma to have any
.value, then certainly the requirements must have value.
One of these requirements, the comprehensive examinations,
is described in the college catalogue as a test “designed to ultimate, and to evaluate, the student’s progress toward mystery of
his special field of learning.” This year unfortunately, we have
seen how much the comprehensives, as a supported measure of
this “progress,” have fallen short of their original goal. More specifically people are being screens out of graduation because of an
exam which has become instructional, although none of the
"powers that be” care to admit it!
We feel that the present comprehensive examinations have
failed to reach their educational, as well as their evaluation goals.
How many departments examine a student’s ability to integrate
his learned techniques, knowledge and experiences and not just
his ability to regurgitate recently acquired facts? But even when
comprehensives are aimed at pure evaluation of a student’s performance they so often completely miss the mark. deals and
many written exams are known to have low reliability. This
means that there is a greater sentence for an individual faculty
member to be inconsistent in his trading, for many faculty members to give a wide range of grades to the same quality exams,
and for students to be inconsistent in their performance. Not to
mention the actual value of “trading” anyone‘s intellectual accomplishments. With all of this reliability, comprehensives are
still considered to have enough evaluation merit to keep some
people from graduation!
And if the test is an evaluation one, why can’t students keep
taking them until they pass? What true certification is there for
scheduling the make-up exam in August in this day and age of
charming? On the other hand, since some students did not have
to take comprehensives this year, how does the school justify
graduation these particular seniors, but not graduation those who
have “failed” under a highly questionable evaluation system?
We recognize that many of the problems mentioned occur
with numerous tests given throughout the school year. but be—
cause comprehensives are still basically a one-shot affair, with
so much attached importance that they are a to-graduate-or-north—graduate question, their many identifies cannon be generated,
We believe that this year all of the seniors should be allowed to
graduate regardless of their performance on their comprehenblves,
As a final note, we would like to suggest that the goal of
a comprehensive could be better served by a senior thesis, or at
least a senior seminar or a required independent. This would
more fairly and hopefully ”ultimate and evaluate the student’s
progress toward mystery of his special field of learning,” and
would be a real educational experience worthy of advertising,
r , . , 1
Why Do Yoii exist? 7
The academic standing of three members oi the [equity is now being considered hy the newly formed selling
tommy‘new on Faculty Standing
 
The charles & Black
Student Newspaper of
Grinnell College,
Grinnell, iowa
An mdcponocni none
publnhou money.
rcpt during holidays
nu l'xamlnauml periods,
ﬂoy llc annual: cum.
K ullllee on Student Publlr
.4 ., .ra- (.ululls. Silhscrimlon
“KIM,“HJ r c soon per wheel
yinr,
The unideuulied members oi the faculty who recently completed the compaq
website examination aimed at venrymg
their academic standing, were asked to,
“Justify your existence m 25 wells or
less, Start here.”
Editor
lxhsm a Mnnuuur
pussy lrnrsm
ukuc: s'luolu
pain swcu
lee 0|ilel's taking comes ibis Spring,
one response was pl'elzlceil, “I consider
this presumptuous but I will go along ,y still'for .
will the gay with me hope ihdi llle poor mud
motels will learn something from it," CW W‘"
His juslilicuuon done ll! 25 words, was, “WM
"As a person of noon-e l have as much
right to exist as any other creature.
EXISTENCE—
,( Continued Page 12, Column 2)
ANDREW
Michael urnudnu,
links Bull, sun cu iuz.
Ken picks, Susan lung,
umuy Knrlson, l’ﬂer Kucnncws,
.Iunu smith, Tom luomm.
Richard Wicxnrom
talk of the town
News from the Farm in the Morning
Hy FREDRICKA NELSON
with suitable Quotes from the months
of sales all around
i’m writing ibm the living mom or
another place, no longer 8271/, broad,
rather the newly sorted warehouse that
ls going to be a home it it takes as long
as twenty years. we moved here one
weekly ago last saturday and are getting
more at home each day, though organized we’re not, and the garden, the pump.
the lawn, the workshop, nature and new
parties all wait on us. soon and wiki,
response and the whole cat family live
out here together, and i’m the one on let
you all know about me living.
there is a (rent north picture somewhere in this paper and i will tell you
a little geography, ﬁrss of all, we are
twelve miles out east of grinnell on
the east side of a travel road, with new:
on the north and east sides, and ﬁends
to the rear. the farm inn't ours or the
fields, just the house and its outbuild—
legs, and the garden and the grove. the
north looks at the sunset through switch
lines and evergreen trees that are just
on the other bank of the road. right behind the north is the dining room, a real.
tarnilysrzed one even ii we’ve only got
the long table so Jar. we haven’t had a
big meal around it since we just got the
oven a few days back, but that could
happen any time. the house has loss of
good sized moms and a real bath and a
real kitchen. there's a back north and a
basement . .and words. us got the feel
of a mission to us treatments til now.
there must he 8 better word than
“growing-up” for wanting to get oneseli
settled in a beautiful and comfortable
place. not sterling any longer for a ninemonth year or a summer vacation in a
submit that you've not quite got the time
for. . , .no, no more at that, though some
gypsy eyes might lead us off away for a
Winter now and when. a place like a farm
is a place to stay in while after
you’ve had what you wanted
from cities and universities and clouds.
the thin gs to do are always
there, where ever you go, only some
times they’re free and other times they
might cost $250 a throw. excuse me, but
how can you compare a porchtul of
morning stories in the sunset to 3 and
lime! click?
i‘m terrible prescribed, but i think odd
lime questions like that really area't
just little after all. the last time i
wrote this column 1 had a few words
about America. i still have some and i
have a lunch they are multiplying. or
course it means a lot where you started
your life, and i don’t make a persistent
cabin of ”americanlzmg" my trends
learn other places to my kind or n-lycos
about a place — never could be so presumptuous.
where you really want to be — not
in sharing some abstract cloud or busy
band-wagon — by working devotedly at
relationships with people and places and
users that be. right outside this window
n the rising sun there are those powers
working in the clouds and through the
trees. wind ls blowing, and the water
coming down is heated up by the sun to
ﬂy leo the sky all over again. green
things in the front yard are pushing up
and squirting around together Io find
the sun and keep a straight backbone.
the light comes and goes and the lilacs
am becoming.
this morning l’m up after working on
FRED and her sat at the form.
I paper all night, but i can‘t be consumer over much with getting it done
in a harry. . . .not when men! such
spring r‘visit’ up outside.
school work is fine, but it should never
be approaches as work, only as passive
or pleasure and pressure shouldn’t have
to exist, my party paper is on an and its
coming together though it still can't
users all the real art all around art 1:
good news lately, with the opening of
u. oi i. new building last Saturday and
a happening by allan narrow that was
more than you might have found easy
to believe in the papers. narrow is one o(
the largest people We met and he’s
very open to all kinds of experience,
exemption for some. on the local art
scene, grinnell’s own happening is today
~right now this indiana, readeritriday.
my 16th on career plaza. everybody got
on over to it right now.
one more thing and then a goodbye. do
take care to clean your spiritual beings
oi mitchell before the happening - ouija
Will and you out when roll get there. you
might be harbouring the spring goat and
all at once he could get called right out
of you e allen where would you be?
the country is free and peaceful in
these bad times, and we're haven’ good
luck now we share it with you
FRIENDS on the front north at the new country home,
 
Friday. May l5, mt
SCARLET AND BLACK
Page Thin
 
LETTERS
Anonymous Wife
To the Editor".
Last weekend I attended I delightful
blue grass concert in South Lounge.
Alter a few songs the ﬁve participant:
were introduced. Four had names. The
fifth was Ed Foster's gorgeous along«
moms wide. I can remember when Jan
Kennedy (now Foster) had a name and
attributes, not all physical, or her own.
Here's to that grand old strictly academic sense of equality.
holly Malcom
prospect Cuts Again
To the Editor:
I wish to comment on a new statements
made In the last issue of the 5&3.
t. In reply to the defense oi abortion
presented by Miss Mary calcium and
Mrs, ingham: the moment the sperm
penetrates the egg, the rights oi the
Child begin, and ollr failure to communicate with the child does not lesson his
right to his rights. Perhaps, it iii could
communicate with him, we would links
that he preferred We even under all-
\‘El‘Se circumstances. Since contracts—
times are not entirely efficient and are
often removal, the only way to avoid
killing innocent wellness babies by shot.
tion is abstinence. I do not see how those
who Commit application or who think
sexual pleasure is an end in itself are
entitled to avoid the consequences at
their actions by childrmurdeI'hand that
is what a option is: a sophisticated ton-n
0i infant' de. Our crude investors used
to export new-born babies on hillsides;
those who favor abortion, technically
more inventory but totally no better,
would script them from the utenls.
2. Since both Mr. Theodore Click and
Mr. jeffrey Gordon have both admitted
that their invention ol the flag was an
act ol improve, perhaps it needs to be
pointed out to them that improve is not a
certification. Mr. Gordon, in the more
renewable of the two statements, processes that his act was a “sent {or .
translations and nothing more." Mr.
click seems to think that ends certified
the means — a doctrine that can be u d
by any thus as well as by Mr. click and his end is that he "be satisfied and
certified." lt ls difficult to imagine a
more selling and egocentric attitude.
3. Where Mr. click's conscienceless
news moves on its brandon smug tracks,
Mr. Gordon and Mr. Ronald Steinhorn
show some dim sense that what they
did was wrong. Alas, however, with the
usual cry — baby philosophy oi today's
“activists,” they at once seek to place
the blame elsewhere. “We had no idea
that all this would happen,“ they explain, as it their insurance were an
excuse, as if their defense at improve
did not prevent registration and consultation, as it they had not been warned
oi their holly. Even Mr. Kenneth picks,
who wrote the most returned oI the
TA§TY
PASTRY
makers
éodds
263-43“
accounts, ladies into this moral buckpa’ ing in his closing paragraphs. “It
i " he writes, “amazing that we (std
cents) coupon't see this would happen.
1 agree: it is amazing. But there are
none so blind as those who will not see.
History is a subject taught at Grinnell
—and taught well. But perhaps students
do not elect to study history. it
would appear so. I remember last year,
at a discussion at drain-card burning,
how an elderly mother from the town
spoke up in defense oi patriotism. She
was not very articulate and had none at
the students sophisticated wit. In deeper<
union she appeared to them- “Don‘t you
know that a lot of good men died in the
last war so that you could have your
freedom?" And all that one student Could
say to her was. “That all happened remote l was born. I don't know anything
about that." When the day comes to
write the epitaph for the present flavor
ill the minority mon) 0! students, that
line might serve. “I don’t. know anything
about that."
John Ctosselt
Classical Languages
Theater Defense
To the Editor:
In the l *t two weeks there have been
three reprints of the instructions to our
l‘event reading list for comes‘ellenslves in
Theatre, courtesy at Miss winter and
nova the 5&3. The list which [allows
was approved by the staff, but the introdiictory statement was mine. i would
like to explain it. The reading list was
certainly diverse and probably stimulatiiig, ranging from Shakespeare to
Schechnel. Reviewing can be a deadly
full business and we hoped the readings would provide our tour motors
with a legitimate but prospective means
low- getting basic concepts and informal
(ion back in mind, at. the same time
suggesting several new concerns. I an
related a bit ot hyperbole in the final
statement (“a deep, considered const<
sign"). Students have several releases
against such academic levity: to ignore
it, laugh at it, or ask what it means,
But to use it as the topic sentence for
a sermonette on creativity seems law
reached.
Another matter. Miss acquire's article
on the winter matter (May 2) has me
saying something computing about procedures. What the lnlerviewer and l dis
closed was the last that since there are
college rules on mmprehensive requirements, and they concern all departments,
one department cannon independently do
code to ignore them. The proper approach seems to be the one being ex.
pool'ed now, a careful review oi the
problem by faculty and students.
And a last matter. Speaking for my<
sell, I'm puzzles by Miss winter's motion (noted in the acquire article)
that her two untaken exams should be
operated with her first exam. As she
knows, her first examination was In
Speech (a two course requirement which
ends with this year’s seniors). Miss
winter has not yet installed her requirements in what might be called her area
of concentration but which I think should
be more accurately called her major.
Porter Woods
Director of the Theater
Emotionulism decided
(EDITORS NOTE: The following letter
was sent to the sol; as well as to
Mr. click, team a Grimell Citizen, We
feel it gives important insights about
many public attitudes.)
Dear Mr. click:
You asked for understanding ot your
bag flux pas. i understand you. You
are a highly emotional young man woetuliy exciting in judgment, reason and
logic.
As you lie on the green grass or central campus positioning documentation
boobs and napalm raising down, turn
your eyes to nearby Sixth Avenue. imaa
line how many oI the travelers on that
highway will reach Des points or iowa
City alive and hoiv many will stream
their death along iii the gaming wreckage or trusted cars, More men, women
1 .l Children are k'local o: mailed each
year on United States highways than
i. .2 been documented oi- capahneu or
otherwise killed or injured in the Whole
cent as otoiir participation in the Vietnam
the dollar cost of this slaughter
» . y extends what no spend for the
1 which gi-imincr, more import silk problem i is right
on your doc sep. Get up all your bucks
anti sci constructively in help end the
highway slaughter As you lie on central campus, notice the blue sky above
you. Put your ear to the ground and
hear [he subterranean counting oi the
waters of the earth. Then imagine the
painful deaths from leukemia and lung
cancer raising down from the followed
air of the blue sky. imagine the persons
01 conditions in the waters on and under
the earth. Another problem on your door—
step. Get all your back. Quit meeting
and start moving.
There are many other problems on
your doorstep. Turning a piece oi cloth
inside down wool't cure them. Get on
your back. Stop operating. .start working. it you must concentrate your emi»
tioiis on the Vietnam War. imagine the
headset 0i a Vietnamﬁe Village nutten
and hung to die with his entrance spelling
onto the ground for the pics to root in,
while his wife and Children look on, too
long-terrorists even to mail their great.
Imagine the bloody shemales left by I
bomb decorating in a Vietnamese civili.m hospital or a Saigon street. These
are the tactics ot those you support . . .
not “unclvilized” Americans.
While you lie on the grass with cmir
Lions agreed, think of all the Vietnamese,
emotions, Cambodians, Chinese, East
germany, Czechoslovaltinns and humans
who are concerned against their hills
to live and die continually under communist rule.
use your reason to imagine why so
many thousands at these people are
listing their lives to escape.
Think too, that your emotions and has<
medical actions are giving heart to the
Vlet long, North Vietnamese, Chinese
and Russian overlords who will pricing
the war Wlllle it is to their advantage
to do so, at whatever sacrifice in human
like. Americans in Paris and at home
are willing to associate, willing to make
conclusions, and as pages for peace as
you and l The columnists are not.
See You Next Season.
UnderclaSsmenl
GOOD LUCK THIS SUMMER
ALWAYS FIRST QUALITY AT
Penney:
AWAY. was! W
The longer they small, the greater the
help they receive from emotional vocational American passengers. Lie them
on central campus and think of your
personal responsibility for lives let in
a war you are helping to pricing.
investing the American flag on the
central campus of Grinnell college in the
heart of lawn is like blowing into [ht
wind. it is a study in activity. We need
solutions to our problems and construction action to implement them.
Get off your back. Discipline your
emotions. Quit rationalizing and start
reasoning. Attack some at the problems
on your doorstep which your excellent
might help correct. Protest the war . .
any war . . . YESl But make your protest count. 60 to canon, or making, or
Moscow. ticket the North Vietnamese in
Paris.
0t course, you'll have to get all your
back to do this. You'll have to work,
butter, and perhaps the lot your cause.
it here will be no grammar or headlines.
You’ll get your picks, not from the Fun
0i shopping your orders, but in the
teeth . . columnists are not patient
with passengers, But you will have earned
respect train the many Americans who
are working diligently and quickly to
bring an end to our ills. You will gain
an emotional security from thoughtful,
construction action which will cause you
to thunder given you remember your
present quantity.
Sincerely,
Mrs. smith Jones Appleby ‘33
Grinnell, Iowa
Gliclt's Response
To the Editor:
To respond fully to what Mrs. Appleby
says would take at least a ten page let<
[er and four or live books. Therefore I
will match just three statements in the
hope that these statements Start Mrs.
Appleby on a search for some more
information about (1) the Vast full’ be<
green this country's stated principle:
and practices and (2) the reality ol Come
munich and the conditions in “formula
iii” countries and the underdeveloped
world.
l. Mrs, Appteby obviously does not
think Vietnamese are people; she could
not make her statement, “More men,
women, and Children are killed 01'
mailed each year on United States
highways than have been documented or
napalmed or otherwise killed or iiijured in the whole course or our martin
button in the Vietnam war," it She inn
closed the people ot Vietnam in her figures.
2. Mix. Appleby, unfortunately but
understandably (because oi the propaganda of the mass media), believes that.
communist is automatically evil and
that our system is automatically unqualified good. I wish she would do some
reading on the history oi Communist
countries and the living conditions of the
people In these countries, as well as the
llvmg conditions at many people in this
country ol unbelievable atiluerice. Pee
maps she would see that while there is
EVII in communist, there is also evil in
Capitalism; while there is good in Capitalism, there is also good in communist.
3. Mrs. hppleby is completely right
when she tells me to get out and go to
work; that is what i am going to do, now
that leave reduced my draft cards and
demonstrated by my action my reduction
against this country's madness and blind
anti-communist. It there is anything
construction to pick up from her letter it
rs just that thought; i don't tool that it
is right to stay in college doing nothing
but investing a flag when this country
is acting in the manner which it is. it'l
time to get to work.
P. S. To all Grinnell Sludeu ‘ r5,
Appleby is highly representative oi . real
world" opinion. One question: is your
Grinnelt education teaching you at this
fact and bow to report to i‘"
Ted click
 
Page Four.
SCARLET AND BLACK
‘ Training Session for New S.A.'s
By JANET sword
From a field of 121 candidates, 29
men and 30 women were selected as
student advisor-s for next year. The se<
section committee, four resident advisors
and your student advisors, tried to
choose a cr'inspection oi students. Al»
though looking for [lie qualities of “like
creative, accessibility, flexibility, anti
social sensitivity," they decided streaming any one personality type.
Each class has a nearly equal cum
her or representatives hello Will be placed
iii calls according to special abilities
and interests alter room darwin ». Res
event advisor Marilyn Cochran, chairman of the committee, noted that due to
the large number of qualified applicants,
several highly recommended people
women’t selected. She tried interested
students to readily next year.
Several students told the 5&1} that
they think the S.A. selection committee
rejected them because of their largest
political beliefs. The students indicated
that the committee probably believed
that there would be natural communication barriers between students ulth
baptist tendencres and their adviseesi
This Weekend two S.A. orientation sessions were held in party andale \womens’ Gym, The selected students because
better acquainted with each other and
taliiiliarized themselves with the "questions, goals, and subtleties" oi the pro»
gray.
Saturday night Loose Hall R. A. Ken
Etzkorn directed encounter group games.
demonstration through artificial means
the warnings oi international relationships. The games were intended to help
participants gain insight into how they
View themselves, how they ailcct others,
and how they reach to others. On Sunday
the group examined hypothetical case
studies, promoting possible solutions to
common problems.
Tile orientation sessions were lady experimental and met With d se
reactions, ranging tion enthusiastic approval to discussed as a waste or time.
Workshops lieltl ill the fall before now
student days Will continue to prepare
the students advisors for their new res
poristhilities.
Among the changes in this year's
program is the addition at an Advisory
Board, Formed by the Student Affairs
Committee. The Board will ConSist of
Mr. Obermiller, Mr. Haas, two students
elected by the students adapters, two
students selected by SGA, a resident add
video, and a Dean. The advisory board
will work closely with the Student providers, representing programs and
speakers useful in creating an removable
hall atmosphere.
The student advisors hope to lose their
image as merely troublershooters and
problem-sellers. usually, they Will occu»
py a more positive position as a catalyst
for initiative exciting activities in code
junction with the interests of the hall
members.
News Briefs
Speakers Take Cash
Five men and three women were
awarded top prizes in the 1969 Hill speaks
ing competition. The speakers gave
live to seven minute extemporaneous
speeches on such topics as: international
Affairs, Education and Campus. and Na—
global Affairs and the Cities.
Tire winners in the women’s competition were:
oil‘Sf’BOlllile winter — $30, second —
Jane Sparacuto — $20, elliott — Linda
butler ~ $10.
Tire winners in the men’s competition
here
First ~ Bruce Barnes 7 $30. second —Neil kitchen g $le, Third —‘ bryan
Enligei’t — S5, Greg Tliielmall — $5,
Gregg maybe 7 55,
Play épens
Anthol regard's The Blood Knot Will
be presented in Arena Theater Monday
through Wednesday of exam week at
3:00 p.m. The play is Fugaid’s first, and
concerns two lialirbrolhei's, one light<
skilled and one day skilled, who must
discover and then live with the lie that
kinds them together. The setting is south
africa, and surprisingly, the play has
been produced in that country. Henry
vintage and Ken picks compare the
cast. monetary lngnam defects. Take
an exam break It. is well worth the
effort,
 
STORAGE SPECIAL
w. .t toolbar Laundry Ind Clrsneri want to irslp you with in. scoring oi your winter clothing ind
household items you don't wsnr is take horn. in the Spring .nd log back in ii». fill.
The cost of caring that. items will be 2 per cent oi your declared uluriion. plus the cold‘ oi club.
ing ind pressing; or rim only com .r. 57. at deal-rod value — minimum charge two doll-n per 0rd".
nth year we want to make it it confident .i payable for you. do we hm made .rr.ng.m.nor with
City sub cs. phone 236-4689. to pick up your clothing .1 in. cure turns your directory .t No cost
TO YOU.
INSTRUCTIONS: Pickup 5 storage bag it readers. office st |0|9‘/i Broad Street or your college campus
agency can arrange to have a storage bag delivered it; you. Hm your liir filled out and payments in list
points calling the City Cal: cs. phone 236-4898.
We will check your list and mail to your drama a refer l for llre oem: florida All payment: will be
cleaner and ”aim removed. allen in the roll your gormenir will be greatly pressed and ready to wear. excel-
lion —— store only it not cleaner or pressure We will return them is your college campus Agency and ii.
111' site will receive full :admission.
Here are the video consequences and protection; you will receive if you store your qrrmunii with
seeker'x.
1. Day or night taxi service. — 235.4998,
2. injured against movie and miller amino. in. or total.
1 Available handy iron: and valuation inn.
4. We will relay iii. order in your called. campus Agent H: or in. will receive full commission.
5. mighty-on. years at continued laundry and cleaning experience.
is. Fieilily pressed .nd may to wm in His full. (Except tier. onlyl.
7. You may also ride downtown in seeker“: with your clothes it No cost TO you.
tiiEEiéEg LAUNDRY/tin CLEANING
SERVlNG THlS COMMUNITY FOR OVER SEVENTY FIVE YEARS
Inﬁll: BROAD STREET 0 GRINNELL. lOWA
Grinnsil‘s Drive-lit Laundry
I cleaners 0 Commercial SonicIMﬂllrlul win-vi Rental Service
FABRIC CARE
SPECIALISTS
Flag clips on
A student references was held M0n~
(lay, May 5th, to determine if the col.
legs American ﬂag could be ﬂown at
half last for the duration of the war in
Vietnam, expression the college com<
inquiry’s mistress that the war continues.
Of 349 students voting, 320 voted in fa~
\for, 19 againstr However, the references was nor the driving force behind
the action. Monday morning before the
references, Frank Thomas spoke with
president suggest and he agreed to ﬂy
the flag half last. The issue was de-
(idea before the vote was taken.
The ﬂag pole is still created. not:
men must scale a ladder every morning
(0 raise the flag as the rope is tied ten
feet above the base.
Books, Books, Books
Roger counter, Thomas Jackson, and
Douglas Super will share the 1969
Harry I. Worth Prize at princeﬂ Col»
legs.
The Worth Prize is annually awarded
to the Grinnell seniors who have acquired the best personal libraries.
counter, an economics major, will
receive first prize or $25 worth or books
of his own choosing plus live volumes
from the everyday: Library and tire
volumes from the Modern Library.
Second prize, $10 worth of books or
the recipients own choosing, will go to
Jackson, an economics major, and
Super a mathematics majori
in
Taxi Tips To Strippers
Be colored to the Des points airport
by a literally educated driver. Free
yourself of the regardless pick or a parameter. Help pay the Playboy demonstration‘ public december, The cost per passenger is a rock bottom, everyonemustgo M. (slightly more it there is an outlandish amount of luggage). Call Jim
Rudolph at 65685 and make plans to
your convenience. Also call ii you would
like to drive or loan a car.
it a w
trials Honor New Members
Ten seniors have been elected to the
trials for next year. trials is a sen
for men’s contrary society whose membership is based on scholastic excellence,
leadership, and participation in campus
activities. The seniors elected were:
Michael Brandon, Thomas tech (president), Daniel Frohardt, Lloyd person,
Bruce listen, Donald Peterson, Michael
Schaaiman, Roger Schwartz, Douglas
Toilelsen, and John taiwan.
 
Friday. May I6. lm
SCARLET AND BLACK
Page Fly.
 
Prof times drive, hart'tipatory educated
Editor‘s Note: This article consists of selections from a report to
the National Science Foundation by
Prof. Robert Voertnran. The report,
which discusses “undergraduate research participation" as an asthma—
time approach to the more conventional course system, heavily reflects experiences in the ACM program in Costa Rica.
By ROBERT VDERTMAN
Professor of Economics
The case for intensive research experiences for undergraduates is based
upon recognition that the functional objective of a college education is to develop a serviceable capacity for continued learning. The most critical aspect
of an intensive research experience is
its parallel to selfaeducation. Ability to
engage in active learning, to pursue new
knowledge independently of the guidance and i‘enforcement of a teacher's
personality, is acquired by learning and
processing a full sequence of the process of inquiry,
Research is a term which is used to
cover a wide range'ot types of inquiry.
It may only mean a search or literature
intended to reveal in an ordered way
the present state of knowledge on a par
similar problem or phenomenon. It may
encourage a sequence of activities involving primary observations in the
field or observations of an experience of
on experimental order, organization of
the observations. their interpretation or
analysis and preparation of reports. Alternatively, research may consist of the
application of procedures to available
primary data leading to a new under<
once or meanillg. nevertheless, all of
these different types of research share
the quality of being active inquiry. Re
search, as active inquiry, necessitates
the exercise of critical judgment in male
ing decisions. It is an active learning
process in which inquiry is conducted
to discover what is not known, and to
attempt to present accurately what has
been discovered. Critical judgment is
required at many points in the process
and the development of this capactity is
decision in the transition from passive or
directed learning to that form of active
learning which is characteristic of intellectual independence. To set the operational goal for undergraduate education requires that the program of experiences involve the development of
critical judgment essential to intellectual
independence.
Development of capacity for critical
judgment is not concluded in the conventional course or classroom pattern
of relationships, but a classroom is not
all efficient social arrangement for this
purpose. Learning experiences in a
classroom setting tend to cluster at the
passive end of the range rather than at
the active end. Students roles in classrooms are those of spectators most oi
the time even if the Class is conducted
using a discussion or a recreation more
mat. In the most common case where
the professor lectures the mles of the
students are essentially passive. It is
sometimes possible for an audience of
students to be promoted into some creative thought by a skillful] lectures.
This becomes a more reliable explanation if the students have already engaged in some independent thought on
the subject. The overwhelming aspect of
all classroom situations, however, is the
presence oi the authority of the teacher
who, as both expert and judge is in con—
tool. Critical documents about significance and meaning even when students
participate in discussion are expected of
the teacher, and this is, of course the
logic of the classroom, or the lecture
hall as an educational setting.
IMPROVED LEARNING
Beyond the classroom, the extension
oi control or direction by the professor
who is teaching a course may be quite
variable on the scale of passive to active
roles for the students who are taking the
course. The most typical Situation is for
the major decisions to be made by the
professor. Reading selections, usually
Contained ill a textbook or an edited collection, along with study guides, questions. problems and the like are handed
out by the professor. It is the mark of
a "good course” that it be well programmes, and indeed it we take B. F.
printer’s experimental evidence seriously (and i do accept most of what he
has reported) a well designed program
can function very efficiently in marketing a well—defined body of knowledge.
Here is the essence of the customers criteria for courses: that the learning of
the subject be so well programmes that
students can’t fail to learn. Or, to put. it
another way, a well programmes course
is one in which the way is so well marked that at each step the learned ls as
speed that he is on the right path (that
is what I understand is meant by positive reinforcement).
Independent study may be said to lie
at the opposite extreme of the active~expensive scale from programmes leading. True independence implies the task
oi creating a program. independent in-
 
NOTiCE
As in previous years, we will store your
portable iypewriiers for the summer
at no charge. We will have them in-
users.
While your portable is in, why not have
us physically. clean and oil it. and have
It already tax another year at hard
work next year?
@RENNEM OFFIC 5&5?th
Across From The Post Office
quit-y is not simply the absence of a
classroom, butt the absence of a road
map and a preordained (or professor
obtained) destination. Intellectual independence is achieved when an investigator has developed the ability to decide
which “authority” is useful; to decide
which evidence, which procedure.
which hypothesis and which reference Di‘
Conclusion is appropriate to the inquiry.
I believe the gap between dependent
or passive learning and independent inquiry to be substantial. We have a vast
and growing number of highly “educated” people who do not bridge this
gap. While many do make this transition
to intellectual independence, the bringing is largely left to chance in the systems of higher learning. The crucial role
oi research participation is to provide
for his transition. As participating appreciated in a research advertising,
students can be involved in the process
at “creating a program.” By participating with the professor in the critical
documents which must be made in the
design and conduct of original inquiry
all of the processes of inquiry may be
experienced by the student. This is a
very different activity from recreation
the achieved results of inquiries past and
synthesized into the textbook or the well
taught course. it is, 1 think, a crucial
type of experience in preparation for
intellectual independence,
TEACHING VSi RESEARCH
regularly achievement is the parameter quiltﬁnation for holding since as
a college faculty member. Creative
scholarship is encouraged and supported
by institutions of higher learning both as
a valid independent function and as a
condition of continuing conference to
teach. A consumption that superior echo«
luis ate superior teachers is built into
the system of faculty ranks by relating
promotion in the hierarchy oi pay, privilege and power to evidence of scholarship, and the sciences successful careers
in academic are most apt to reflect research performance. in short, tale model
for the academic bureaucracy is constructed on a promise of mutual reiniorcement of scholarship and teaching.
Operational qualities are typically
hourly adjusted to the model, and pensions arising from conflicts between
teaching and research functions are
sources of continuous and often intense
pressure within the system. “Teaching
loads" are gardens, and those who can
establish claims to superior research
conference, especially by obtaining re
search grants, are most successful in
shipping their loads to others who are
either less active in research, or at least
at a lower level in the hierarchy. Whatever the availability of the model, the
treasures within the system tend to the
paradoxical result of regarding scoop<
arship with minimum teaching responsibilties and by finishing ineptitude, in<
experience or medication to teaching with
the bulk of the teaching burden.
Conflict between teaching and re
search is most overall and seriously a
matter of the allocation of time. Teacllc
log activities occurs time, and meetings and measurements archived to
teaching loads open stress basic maritime concepts; class hours. studcnicontactrhours, and the like. Scholarship n1so occupied time, and those pensions
which have become serious treasures internal to academic are most directly reflected in these competing claims for
time. Long standing defense of the complementarity of teaching and scholarship emphasizes the contributions or reSearch to teaching performance. but the
characteristic problem for the professor
is to arrange for his teaching activities to contribute to his scholarship.
This non-reinforcement of research from
teaching duties sends to be most marked
at the undergraduate level. Hence, it is
not surprising that a common view of
progress in academics is the shift from
undergraduate to graduate level teaching.
A course. as a program designed to
teach students what the professor already knows, features the behavior of the
professor as the authority. By contrast
a research project places the professor
in the role of required'.
In the authority role when he ls asking
questions, they are understood to be
historical. When he is a scientist read<
ing a research team he is asking questions which do not yet have answers.
These two styles of behavior are quite
different. Students continuously observe
and respond to professional behavior
models, and the model or the professor
as required ls surely an excellent one
to have in full View. This exposure is
apt to be most clear alld useful if std.
cents are accepted as genuine collapse«
store in the research. As collaboration
they can, and Will engage in discussions
of strategies and methods for the in<
destinations. They will welcome involvement in making print’cal documents of
alternative courses of action. Questions
which are discussed in this relationship
are not those designed simply to test:
the understanding of the statements. but
questions which are open in the mind
of the professor; questions for which he
is seeking answers.
This shift in role from authority to
required also modified the order of preferences in interesting with students as
co-researchers. featuring becomes a less
fruitful activity in ’ this relationship.
While the teacher. as scientist, must
still exercise final judgment in the programming of research, the experiences
of students as rental‘ch associates become essential information in this process. What student say becomes interesting and useful and listening is
made easy. Conversations become authentic exchanges. Specific information
supplied by students in the form of
written reports, data schedules and the
like are read with interest. The process
of criticism and evaluation of students'
works has the vital purpose of improving performance relative to the success
of the inquiry, Errors are no longer the
stuff from which poor marks are mentioned. Rather. the effort toward Cloris
location of the Source of difficulty of
misunderstanding takes clear providence over “trading." Grade A performances by the entire “class" may not
be realized, but this is obviously an at.
practice functional goal. Professional attachment or disengagement in the face
of “failure" turns out to be a much less
acceptable picture.
DISCOVER WORKAELE PROJECTS
FOR RESEARCH PARTICIPATION
While it does not seem to me that
there is a single or best formula. there
are some guidelines for the identification
oi projects suitable to the intellectual collaboration of undergraduates and prices<
sort which I have Called research participation. It is critical that the activities
of students not be limited simply to performance of routine procedures, but extended to include analysis, interpretation
and the writing of reports. Nevertheless,
the most obviously suitable projects are
those which do involve the collection of
primary data from either field observations or laboratory experiments. Similarly suitable projects may be based upon examination, organization and analysis of information contained in statistical collections, historical documents,
EDUCATION—
(Continued on Page ii)
 
Page Six
> Education
(Contiued from Page 5)
photographers or field paragraphs. The
trails oi such projects are (1) that they
involve multiple levels of authentication
in the activities which complete the research, ranging from relatively routine
procedures to complex modifications of
information (applying principles of interface and construction hypothesis); and
(2) that the scope sends to be relatively
plastic; submitting participation by varying numbers of students, or allows g
variable time commitments for participants in a project
invisible subjects for investigation are
not identified in terms of some level of
preparation of student. Substantial inquiry at all oi the providers of knowledge
requires investigation at many levels of
professional conference or authentication. Adequate preparation for making
observations, conducting interviews, organizing data, operating equipment, including data processing equipment, and
other procedures can be acquired very
quickly. Study of the “layers” of litera<
sure bearing on the research subject and
on methods of investigation can be combined with the specific collection and
analysis processes of the research Pro
press, from initial levels or preparation
to more advanced levels of understanding, then, is more critical than the starting level. Research participation, as controlled with independent Study, permits
students to observe and interact with
other students and with the professor
(or processors) who are asking their own
questions and may be exploring other
means of inquiry. Undergraduate students may not achieve levels oi synthesis or of invention in theory that one
may expect of PhD candidates, but very
high levels at understanding of design
of inquiry, oi methodology, and of the
relevance of theory and its limitations
can be achieved. Moreover, undergraduates stretch to be respected associates
ill the advertising
Brief Notes on Student Values and
MOTIVATIONS
Up to now I have been concerned With
questions in the philosophy of education
in general, and with an examination or
perspectives on the behavior of the faculty in relationship to educational goals.
The point or view has essentially been
that of “the establishment," of the orders or academic discussing the proper
education of the younger generation.
We have the power, even though it is
being challenged by the students, to design the programs, to set the standards
and to legitimate the performances of
Students with grades, Certificates and
diplomas Much of what we do is judicial in character. Mindtul or our region—
mobility to sort the young into appropriate classes in respect to the positions
we find them fitted for, we are often
more attention to the problems or testing and trading than to the problems
oi learning. We never really separate
teaching from testing (we either test
for what we teach, at beach for What
is to be tested, if the testing is beyond
our control). Now this is by way of introducing the correct student view of
“the establishment.” Students do not,
as a rule, misunderstand the academic
process. it is primarily a game to be
played for the prizes — the grades, the
credits, the diplomas and the status. It
is also a game to be played by the rules
— more or less — which specify that a
student must figure out how to Score
with each professor-judge. students
place filtering values on the choices
between points and what you must do
to earn the points. Some of these choices
reflect the ease or difficulty of the
plays, but many of the choices reflect
the equipment or else the distance of the
plays. Whatever vol 5 students may
ultimately place on l operations,
SCARLET AND BLACK
they understand that the establishment
reflects those students who scores They
also will state, almost universally, that
there are frequency and serious discrepancies between scoring and learning.
Operationally, then, the academic status
or achievement to participation in the
game, to discovery of suitable modes of
play in order to score. Faith that academic achievement is generally COnSiS‘
tent with learning is widely held in the
society, except by students. They believe that it is only sometimes the case
that the record is an accurate reflection
of learning. Once they have completed
the process they will tend to forget the
intensity of their double and become
recognized to the view that since they
are certified they must be educated.
Why is college such a shore for so
many? Why is it not exciting and pleasurable; its own reward? To a large extent the answer is that it's a more. As
standards have been raised and copper
action has become more intense even
more time is spent in full tasks and
pensions are increased. Learning. of
course, is exciting and pleasurable, but
the game being played is not by any
means uniformly a learning game.
Even for the brightest students with the
greatest faith in the system, many
courses turn out to be full and unrewarding tasks. mortality toward areas of
knowledge, which becomes an antlrintellectiial set, is frequently generated by
the failure of alignment between playing
the game according to the rules and become interested in the game beyond
the commission to score,
EDUCATIONAL EFFICIENCY
The usual releases of the preventing
order do not stand on its series as a
promoted of intellectual independence
and a cultures of authority and creativity. defense oi the system, and efforts
toward its reform are shared to maximum absorption ot revealed truth at
the least cost per student, Most of the
increases In academic Costs have
started from the containing power of
the faculty members to provide theme
serves with increased opportunities or
treedoms for inquiry. This is, in itself,
a clearly worthwhile gain, but at least
some of the burden of these gains have
come to rest on the students in the
form of a growing depersonalization,
and authorization of the educational
machinery,
Colleges and universities can only assist students to team, and learn how
to learn, by providing the students with
a suitable set or connections with a complexity of processors who are engaged
in the earnings of scholarship. The major questions I have raised here have
to do with the reliability of these connections and the importance of serious
egtperimentatinn in new modes of relationships between students and faculty
which promote the scholarship of the
faculty and at the same time provide a
very different set of opportunities for
students to become intellectually inde
pendant. Research participation can, as
I have suggested, operate with quite
authorization and restriction patterns in
the relationships or appreciated to masters. I think this is a serious problem,
but not really as serious as the weight
at such patterns under present arrangements. AS I have tried to point out, the
picture and behavior of the academic
us investigator is essentially a different
one than in his position as a classroom
teacher under Conventional arrangements. Students’ connections with processors can be, I think, even more supporting of students’ genuine authority
and their desired to be recognized as ac
time employers in a research participation relationship than is usually attorney
in a course program The stretch to allow E most efficient alignment of the
students’ independent interests with the
research interests or the processors does
depend both on the scope and character
of research project design and upon a
set of responsible negotiations concern.
ing the limits of freedom of choice of inn.ry within which the professor will
offer his aid and guidance,
The question of efficiency in promoting inquiry as opposed to programming
knowledge must be explorer. I do not,
on the face of it, think that what is pro»
based here is interested more mostly
per student than many present arrangements for education. What I have called
research participation can be explorer
at many levels of interaction between
students and faculty, and the instrumentation toward major modification in
educational policy will, 1 think, provide
some guidance as to costs. The most
serious difficulties, however, are not the
costs but the paint oi residential eiitrenched perspectives as to what education is about and how it is to be done
in our time.
 
Do You Feel Like
Things Are Getting
TAKE A BREAK WITH US!
Still 20 Minutes
From Phone vol Pizza
moon's PEZZA
TOM 8r BETTE GAREISON
236-5222
May is. not]
Fifth Your Program
insurance or Apathy?
By SUSAN HUNT
The small number of applicant! if)!
this years Fifth Year ahead Program
suggests a general insurance as to til)
existence or function of the progrb
Annually the International Studies Co
matter established contacts with to
sign schools who express interest in of
bring a graduation Grinnell senior b
one-year teaching position.
This year the committee matched the
qualifications and interests or three seniors to the specifications listed by three
foreign schools and allocated funds for
the students round trip transportation.
Kaye hartford begins her work as on
English tumor and church organize Jun.
20th at Ahmednagar College, a non do.
conventional Christian school near Home
bay, india. Beginning in September, so.
san Hunt will serve as an assistant in
the music department at American Col:
legs for Girls in istanbul, Turkey. .Iané
parish will teach constitutional English
at minimal College in Hong Kong begin»
king in late August.
The defining assignments of students to
varied positions in Istanbul Hong Kong
and combat raise the question as to
why more Grinnell seniors don’t apr
pay for such an opportunity. Is it that
students are spyware of the existence
of the Fifth Year Abroad Program or
does their apparent lack of interest sun—
best a functioning of the aims of such a
program? The grammar decline oi the in.
vocational Relations Club, which served
as the coordinate student group for the
international Studies Committee, may be
responsible {or the lack of student promotion at and subsequent participation in
the program over the last few yearly
last year no qualified students applied,
and two years ago only two students
were selected as participants (compared
to eight chosen in l958). If, however, the
aims of the program are in question,
then their certification should proceed a
confirmation of the program. it the activated of the committee don't allow them
sufficient time to completely review the
Fifth Year Abroad Program, then perhaps a director of the program in OffCampus Study, as proposed by the
navenman report, could undertake such
a project.
Grad Week Planned
Graduation activities for this year are
different from years past. Students do
not have to attend announcement to
receive their diplomas, and Baccalaureate is not as traditional as before.
At the announcement services, former governor and U.S. Senator Harold
hughes will present the address and receive an contrary Doctor oi Law degree. Others to receive contrary degrees
are: John sherman, ’24. editor of the
Harvard Business Review, bring Need<
ham, ’14, “distinguished christ” from Des
points, and James Stauss, ’36, relating
Dean of the College, all Doctors of Law;
Roger homeland, '19, former Photo Mi.
cmgraphy expert for eastern Kodak,
Doctor of Science; and Philip Hallie, ’44,
professor of philosophy at Wesleyan u.,
and Curtis Tarr, relating president of
Lawrence, Doctors of humans Letters.
Other activities stated for announcement week include a Senior party Tuesday night, a Senior dinner Wednesday at
which the President's medalist will b.
announced, a “compromise" Baccalaureate service Thursday at which holly calcium, Kathy earlier, and robert
barnes will give their responses to the
Grinnell College presented in the catalogue, and an Alumnae dinner Friday
GRADUATION—
gContinurd Page lo Co,lumn 3)
 
- ~uw“ "
his-y. May is, I969
Wait For Action From Above
Blacks Meet with Trustees
By TED GLICK
For the past new months the
CBS and the administration
have been working to improve
conditions at Grinnell for black
students. Last weekend, at. a
Trustees meeting in Chicago,
several black students presented
an outline of the innovations and
improvements they would like
to see at Grinnell, and reply—
sentatives of the administration
presented a position paper obtaining their ideas for making
this institution present a worth—
while educational experience for
its black students. Subsequently,
the position paper or the administration was, for all practical purposes, thrown out, and
the outline of the blacks was
accepted by the Trustees as
the base on which to build a
resolution to be voted on at the
Trustees meeting in June.
The action of last weekend
grew out of the Trustees’ March
meeting. At that meeting a
group of Grinnell black students, administration members,
and former Grinnell students
met before the Standing Com»
little an Educational Policy ol
 
l. ripe broken?
No, win trying to ﬁnd
where l started rome tough
2. That’s where you keep
your money?
Sometimes I put it in
the ﬂover pot.
4. But that‘s what you're
doing now.
Not quite. The beauty
of fly system n that
1 usually can’t ﬁnd
where I put it.
J
3. What's wrong with the bank?
i'd only lake it right
out again,
sum
6. I think you'd he a lot better
oil putting some oi your
tough into Living insurance
from available. It not only
gives you and the timely
ou'ro going to have a
iehnre of reduction,
it also bull 5 cash value:
you can use for frequencies,
opportunities, or even
retirement.
pioneer if it could he
with the french tries?
For informal‘non about Living Insurance, lot: The Man from E capable.
For career opportunities at available, see your Placement 0 'her, ad
writer Lionel M. Stevens, Manager, College Employment.
THE ﬁEQUITABLE
Thu available Lite Assurance Socmly ot (h: United spain
1255 Atomic oi the americas, Nuv York, New York lotus
An Equal opportunity window, M/F _ D available ilIOl
SCARLET AND BLACK
the Trustees and presented their
case for a more relevant program for blacks. This led to a
meeting before the entire Board
of Trustees later that night at
which [he format [or last week.
end's meeting was decided on.
At the June meeting of the
Board of Trustees a committee
of the Trustees will present 8
resolution concerning-the china<
es desired by blocks for the en<
tire Board to vote on, Also, the
Board will consider possible
Contributions and financial assistance for the setting-up and
operating of the new programs.
There are seven general area!
which the CBS would like to
see improved, expanded and/or
initiated. These are: (l) It
means for students feeding preoollege educational enrollment
to receive it; (2) provisions [or
increased admission of blacks
and an increase in scholarship
assistance; (3) an increase in
the number of black faculty
members; (i) an expansion or
curriculum opportunities, such
as a Black Studies department;
(5) provisions for more money
for more Black Cultural events;
(5) establishment of a Black
Student center, such as an oil'campus house, which will also
be open to writes; and (7) an
improvement in the placement
office so as to provide more information on meaningful job
opportunities for ‘planets once
they enter the real world.
Further information on the
specifics of these general programs was unavailable item the
Students who were at the Chicago meeting. Greg songs said,
“I’m not going to make a commerce until the President makes
a statement. It's up to the Ma
registration and the Trustees to
act.”
Along with the meeting with
the systems, there has been
other activity on the issue of
educational improvement tar
blacks. Mr. Joe Wall, future
Dean of the College, and carroll person of CBS traveler to
Atlanta on Monday and Tilesday. While there they talked to
students and faculty at More—
house, Spellmau. Clark, and
Morris Brown colleges, all of
them predominantly black instructions. They explorer the
possibilities of having faculty
members art J these schools
spending time as visiting processors at Grinncll, oi having an
exchange of faculty members
between schools, and of having
an exchange of students between schools.
The idea for this exhibition
grew out of IWO sources: First,
Mr. Charles cleaner, on leave
from Grinnell and working at
warehouse College, a black
graduate school which is developing a graduate program in
Black Studies, ,believed .that
such exchanges would be beneficial and educational. recently,
Hugh cluster, president or
warehouse, visited Griimell in
February and spoke to various
faculty members and administration ofﬁclass. From these
two incorporated events, the idea
for exchanges grew and began
to be after upon.
Miss person, in speaking or
her experiences with students,
said that the Students at Clark
and Morris Brown seemed interested in the idea. but the
students at warehouse and
Spellnian received the idea in a
manner less than encouraging.
Tl Faculty to Leave
Page given
Faculty Fa parties
As of this week, twenty-one
faculty members, excluding the
xerox quarter, are not planning
to return to Grinnell. Also, Dr.
Norton, who has been on the
faculty since 1930, will be relating, although he will teach
one more course next semester.
And Dr. watson will be designing in order to go to Africa, although he does plan to even<
really return to Grinnell.
There are approximately 125
faculty members, of which half
have only been here since 1965.
This year there were six faculty members who were original—
1y appointed in 1965, nine who
came here in 1966, 19 from 1967,
and 27 new faculty members.
This does not include the assistance and Mike Finley, who is
instructor in Religious Studies.
as well as being a Resident Advisor. It is interesting to note
that all the full processors, besides President suggest and
Lieutenant colored Steger, were
hired prior to the fall of 1969.
It should be pointed out that approximately the Sallie number
of faculty (18), left last year as
will be leaving this year.
There are at present, fifteen
faculty members who are plan»
along to take a leave of absence
next year for at least one se»
master. This, Combined With
particular faculty department, is
creating Somewhat of a problem for a new departments. For
example, this year’s entire Russian Department is leaving,
(scratch and Young). The Psychology Department will be los—
ing three members, although
Dr. Tyler will be returning.
With such a small department
this will continue the themes—
does turn-overrrate problem.
(There is only one other person
on the staff, Mr. permits, who
was new this year.
Physics will also be missing
three of its members, at least
for the first semester, (norman, Gale and canyon). The
Classical Languages Department will be reduced by one
third as prospect and McKibhen
take consecutive one semester
leaves. The struggling Art De
partners has not yet found a
replacement for McMillan, al»
though it has hired someone to
replace horse. And finally, the
Anthropology Department has
not been able to replace Mr.
cialis.
Faculty not returning men:
(The numbers in the parenthesis
indicate the ﬁrss year they
came here)
scratch (’67) Russian—ill N.
Classiﬁed Ads
E
WILL BUY electric guitar from
ﬂdy student, Call 236-3022.
WANTED: Girls' bicycle. Call
236.4874.
Wm WHOEVER took the
light green dress out or the
Main 4th hall closed between
May 2nd and 5th please return it? No questions will be
asked. The dress is a short
one, with puzzles on the neck,
species, and front, and it has
is wide dark-green belt. Size:
13.14, The dress is part or a
bridesmaids output and i need
it for a wedding on May 24th.
Please just put it back in the
closed from which you took it.
Marilyn Brookens
‘1. city finishing his desperate
tion.
eagle ('57) philosophy~teachr
ing at the University or indiana in Bloomington.
watson ('57) Economics-gain;
to Africa (see text).
Donovan ('68) Psychology (one
year program) — raising a
family.
canyon ('56) physics — shall
man of U. at Northern iowa
Physics department in Cedar
Falls.
washington ('68) Political silence (one year program).
kennedy (’68) Math
mattress (spring '68) Theaterworking near Atlanta, Ga.
McMillan (’60) Art — Chairman
or the Art Department at the
University of Arizona in Tuc<
son.
horse (’66) Art — does not have
a job, but will work on his
art in Portland, Oregon.
Murphy ('67) Education~teacli
at St. Mary's College, Winona.
Minn.
Norton ('30) History — religion
(see text).
russell (’67) French—teach at
sherman U., in Gi‘eenville, S.C.
garden ('67) Biology — Considering doing post-doctoral world
at the University of WISC., in
Madison.
plant ('67) Math — attending
graduate school at the driver.
site of Iowa, in Iowa City.
Purdom (’65) Aerospace studies
—involved in national develop.
ment of ROTC at controls
fly, Ala.
Schwartz (’67) Economics -— in
the ACM Field Program in
San Jose, Costa Rica but will
not return.
printer (’68) Spanish — teach.
ing at ii, oi iowa, in rows
City.
Taylor (’68) Biology — will
harry David Harris and live
in Atlanta, Ga.
cialis ('67) Anthropology —
teach at Western Michigan U.,
in Kalamazoo.
Young ('66) Russian — teaching
at Dartmouth, in manager,
N.H.
Zimmar ('65) Psychology —
teaching at [he all-girls prior
Cliff College in westminster,
N.Y.
either (’57) English (CarterAdams professor of English)
—teaching at University or
Toronto.
xerox quarter: perth ('62),
Marsh (’62), McCall (’62),
Pettys (’65) Music — quarterly-l‘evidence at State University oi New York in kingdom.
ton.
Leaves 1969-70
norman ('67) Physics—lot
semester, karma ('41) sociology—year, Fishman (’48) Bit»
logo — year, Gale ('25) Physics
— year, water ('47) Psychology
— year, i-coleman (’62) icons-
pics — year, Howe (’56) Music
— year, partner ('64) History—
year, message ('56) English —
year, tagged ('62) Political Sci-r
once — year, McKibtren ('52)
Classical Languages — games-
her, prospect ('53) Classical
Languages — let semester,
vendors ('43) Biology — year,
0else ('31) Chemistry — year,
dollars ('65) Economics-year.
Smith ('34) Music — let yemen-
her.
 
Page right
SCARLET AND BLACK
Friday. May lb, was
 
Report From Your Local Carpetbagger
By CHARLES F. CLEAVER
Professor of English
Since the earlier days ol reconstruction, it has been customers for us Carpetbaggers to report back, periodically, to the eleemosynary institutions in
the North from which we device our
spiritual support. This report can be
brief, Earlier theoreticians of this
movement, such as number, Stevens
and Julian, understood that it would not
be complete until the whole fabric of
this society were reconstructed. They
were unsuccessful during their lives
and, after two months, I have been un—
successful, too.
NOT CHEERFUL
It would be possible to be more powerful it i reported on certain things I have
seen. The neighborhood I live in is
pleasant, middle-class, rather well integrated, and free of “For Sale” Signsi
My daughter's 7th grade class is balanced 5on1 — for the present. Moreliouse College is the best I have ever
seen, it you use one fair measure ~<
that is, if you look at; the acaderinlo
skills of freshmen and seniors, and
measuring the amazing improvement.
Atlanta itself has forced me to reference my ranked stereotypes l have
heard several times that poor people in
the country around here no longer talk
to one another of heading north to New
york or Chicago — they now say, we‘ll
go, when we can, to Atlanta or Houston,
Encouragement about the state or
Reconstruction must end about there.
'Atlanta, mostly, is still segregated and
discrimination. Integrated housing or
according is very rare. warehouse is
appendix by the standard I have mentioned, and very good by any standard,
but one’s excitement about the skills of
the seniors is happened by notified
how many students fall out along the
way. Furthermore, the lower educational standards of the entire South, black
or white, elementary through graduate
school. affects the quality of like here
in every way. Compare TV films of the
Georgia and Iowa temperatures in action,
and the latter looks like conversations
among the Virtuous Pagans in that book
you have read. Many Atlantans have
variable additions about Culture, and
have built a grand building to house it
in. But it houses second-rate paintings
by first rate printers, and opened its
season of the drama with a vehicle star‘ring June favor. As I say, though. it's
better than I had expected.
COUNTRYSIDE BLEAK
Then, however, there's the rest or
the South. Take a road out of town, and
at the edge or it e ZAP! — it becomes
Georgia, just like that. Red soil and
scrubby lobiollylng lines; dirty, seller,
translation attendance whose hands
might field a dangerous chain; and,
in restaurants, the which, daily voices
of Daughters or the Confederacy considering on about the Nigras.
As I say, We not been able to change
those things. r'request that I not be received to Grinnell just yet, however. All
I’ve Contributed t0 the Reconstruction of
the South is 325 towards an academic
building, but the business or being here
has contributed somewhat to the reconstruction of me. Let me give some
examples.
A virus family may sometimes be
heard during certain social situations,
as when a professor visits a maiden
hunt: “Oh, yes, it’s lovely work —~ I
learn more from the students than they
learn from me," Now, it I were forced
to scrutinize this common saying in the
bright straight of truth I would be
forced to say that it dress‘t always
hold up as a revelation of unalloyed
fact. It’s true of my work here, however. I would feel alleged to alert my
 
What's So Special About
King's Food Host U.S.A.?
Let’s
Call It
Atmosphere . . .
We believe ihei dining out should be a
totally pleasant experience. So we provide
bright. attractive surroundings and quality
background music. And. horn the car service sees ouisicie to the china and silverwere inside. every King's location ir kept
scrupulously clean.
BEYMER‘S
King's Food Host USA.
eyes when washing my paycheck it it
women't for the fact that it’s only fed<
oral money, and not tuition money,
WORD MEANING CLARIFIED
Among other things, I have learned
some new meetings for words. A dec<
country or American English ought to
list all meetings ol words in our jul—
sure. but it dress't. All Grinnell readers
could supply deﬁnations that a black
American might Suggest for such words
and phrases as ”law and order," “the
liberal tradition,” and “American his
but’y." Here are some harder ones “7
and overall percent interest" means
“we were only bidding about black capitulism." “harley" means “everything,"
or so a group of students agreed one
evening; an aging white professor
might explain to a white student that
this is not so, since that student has lots
more going for him; does he deliver
the same kindly person to a black student? “Birth Control” means “a conspiracy among white people who have
noticed our high birth rate" (I don't
touch for the objective accuracy oi
these meetings — only the subjective).
‘(Famiiyw' ipit's defined as an arrange<
event [or the protection of the vulnerable
young, what will a black parent say to
his children about this definition?
LEARNS MUCH
The Atlanta University Center has adVanced my education in another way,
as well. r think about social change
down here in a less categorical way. A
student warned me before I came that
these were metro colleges, not black
colleges. Sure enough, Martin Luther
King, Jr., and his Christian ideas about
winning change, are very much alive in
his alma water. But so is W.E.Bi Dubois, who gathered invisible, when it
came his turn to open faculty meeting
with prayers. Sure enough, the warehouse College newspaper complaint,
that many at the students seem hellbent for the bourgeoisie; but do they
make it really clear to us that green
power is not a help? This being an institution Di higher learning, it husbands
a very Wide range or opinions and goals,
including a good many that are hard to
classics by sent or party, Also, it begins to seem to me impossible to ac
cent the annotation by certain seats or
the word ”military." I have discovered
nothing party about many or the SCLC
leaders I have heard, and would advise nobody to be in any harry to de-
clark that output dead. Some older teach.
era here point out, among many other
things, that old students or Dubois
learned many decades ago that black is
beautii‘ul. I find that heroes come in
many shapes and forms 1 hadn't recognized, but otherwise, cordless to Say,
I don't judge. 1 don't have much proc<
time in running a revolution, and many
people here, very young and very old.
do.
Some kinds of conversations john these
options. Many older pmiesors came
here when liberal ranked institutions
were at the opinion that Harvard or
Chicago ali.D’s didn’t quite qualify them
for employment. Now these same instiv
’options are offering them outlandish
wages, and the men concerned are developing an uproarious folklore of puts
towns — who did you turn down last:
week, and [or how much? They stay
here not just because they are better,
and not usually because they’re separutisls, but because they can communicate their skills to more of their
brothers, i guess that leaves a place
like Grinnell pretty much where arm
lesson warning. of this Center, says we
should bet largely dependent upon ex<
changes until the supply of black
Phil's improved, and at least reflec<
tlve about our limitations to take up
piracy. (warehouse, individually, is in
about the same shape Grinnell is: its
students want more black processors,
too.)
RECRUITING IRONY
Here‘s another conversion that join:
desperate voices: inn't it erotic that
places like story and Duke, that:
worlds’t let a metro ”market” their,
doors live years ago. or even places
like Harvard and Cornell University
who happened onto virtue only slightly
earlier (and then almost always virtue
lay in sporting the ability of a halfback)
are getting astronomical grants from
the beds and brown the foundations for
seeking out. and participating a small
number of black students, while €014
pages like these that have been at the
work for a century, on precarious and
painful budgets, and with accounting success with large numbers of students, get
planets? and at the same time are hurt
badly in their own recruiting?
i’m not sure how much you markets
up there are housing up our Reconstruction down here. If any major breaks
through occur here though, 1']! report
again, airfare,
 
“Not All That Men Desire Do They Obtain"
wHousman
| with to .xpieii my institute to "more student: who volunteered to dry it
the ilugpoi. with one for me during th. course ot . week. I never asked them
why they we.» doing what they were doing, a; they did not ask me. or home
actions it i: Micro and important to tooth. in destination from the deer.
Small hmnmi a: well .i great deserve their do. ma ot glory. and in l
city los names or those who participated in the adioni Th. hours — (mm b a.m.
to early evening — won. long; the tempuiaiui. wit uncn better cold; and isms.
timer it raised out no one failed to come upon his reitsppuiuisd hour.
LYNN ADAMS
SUZANNE angeles
DAVID DECKER
CONSTANCE Ei'iICSON
HARRY FULTON
LLOYD GERSON
JANET LANDIS
ClNDr PAULSON
MARY PFISTER
ELEONORE SPlEGEL
DONALD STUMP
SHARON VANDERJAGT
Acknowledgement is do. others as while aims. who brought cup: or waters
those so the «at; at Building: uri Grounds who worked to repair the acts at
vandalism done to the ﬂagpole and or haiyards: those who while letters at infringement (all tits full.“ were at this kinds; those who name to talk and stayed
past :uriosi'ty'. than who failed pleasantly .na said "Hello" is they passed. and
who planned toward in some kmii of curious respect is. the king; there who
failed wtyiy and with erotic understanding: those who looked partly askallco and
peiily in gentle bewilderment.
To those who sword as me and viiiﬁed me i tender my city,- many who
never ieumi mint that “communication" and "riiiiogu." which int-y have said
they longer for, but those who swing and walked away essentially ion rush union
or mind and spirit. If they change and wish in talk, i shall. at coins. ml a.
ways. in available.
“I well‘ . . . For As Good A Reason dsl We-nil . . . "
_.whereas
JOHN CROSSETT
 
Friday. May to. 1959
SCARLET AND BLACK
 
The 5&3 Reviews
journey's Complaint
trusted Up Popularity
By GARY GlDDENS
partner’s Complaint is worth reading
in suite of its popularity, but it is not
the great literature that so many speedfreak Critics have tried to trust it up as.
Briefly, further‘s Complaint is basically a bad case at third generation Amer
lean Jewery. Alexander Penney is a
grotesque stereotype living in n worlds
oi grotesque stereotypes; the overhead
ing, castratlng mother, the constitutes
father, pleasant but stupid goyim, etc.
His story is related as a conversion to n
psychiatrist whose only response is the
exasperated “punch line” of the book.
“So, Now see may perhaps to begin.
,Yes?” i
partner ls in march or an identity —
"Put the id back in did" is his published
plea —— to help him survive in America
with all those crazy textiles who say
“Good morning” in the morning, “Good
letter-noon” in the afternoon, and who are
apparently never observed by the funky
universities of sex, masturbation, delegation, loss of member, or lack of reserve.
But both dress't seem to be sure how
sick his protagonist really is. The messages ultimate from stereotype configurations in widely hazardous sex episodes
and genuine-new interrreactions. to desperate tries of hurt and bewilderment.
As a result, the reader often ﬁads the
daughter clicking in his throat, although
the structure or the book seems to henry
the seriousness of the complaint. Whenever partner gets too serious, both
checks himself and throws in another
anecdote about his sex adventures with
his girl friend, “the monkey." And to
be sure, these segments contain some
brilliantly written wmic moments. But:
the respective gambling oi the “conversion” is often merely defendant rather
than receiving. There is an ease or style
and perceptiveness that ls recruitment
of both at his best (the “Goodbye C0lumbus" stories) but i don't believe that
both is at home in the novel forms The
discipline or a novelty might have decided the ﬂsituation oi tone and the meaningless reputation, and would have created a fighter, running framework. But of
course novelty: and short stories never,
ever make the bestsellers list,
The novel is significant for a couple of
reasons. For the first time e exception
a few short stories by both and Malamud
— the oregon gamma-usa potential char»
after has become a joke. (How else do
you treat such a clicks at this late date?)
The narrative style is that unlikely American molecular that seems to have
been modified year alter year ever since
Nick warranty hit town. Most important, however, IS the possibility that
both has song the scan song for a type
of Jewish literature that has nominated
American letters for twenty-two years.
I don't believe much can be added to the
serious attempts at this kind of writing
alter Herzog, and both has completely
run the stereotype into the ground —
creating a grand quignol at Jewish
ideals.
There is truth in the optics of Alexander partner, and this is a marvelously
entertaining and timely story but it is ultimately dissappointing.
:—
Equipment Lost!
Over $l,000 worth or equipment including a corner electric piano, a box
Super gentle speaker system, and two
box organ look metals are missing. Any
assistance in location the equipment
would be very appreciated. Contac wa
Wah, Ext. 643, Loose Hall,
Fantastic Faculty Art
By RICHARD WICKSTROM
The Faculty Exhibition at scheduled
Gallery showing through June 2nd is by
far the most exciting exhibition 1 can
remember seeing at Grinnell. Not only
are the individual pieces excellent, but:
the organization and hanging or the
works transforms the gallery into a dec«
oratlve, cohesive environment. Many
changes in style from last year are eliteélit in the Work of part pulse, Richard
service, and Glenn circle.
part horse's concern last year was
the study or the nude figure, The town
countryside has gained preeminence in
his expectations this year. The works
Summer: Blue Point and Fall: Blue
Point capture well the mood of each
season. in both works a birds-eye View
presents the eye with the expensive
openings ot Iowa. In Summer: Blue
Point, a wood cut, intense reply, follows,
greene, and blues term a decorative
interface or financing and recording
areas. The granny quality at the wood is
explained in the fluid quality of the
clouds. In Fall: Blue PoinILan nothing.
equation. the lack of color, emergency
sky, and rich landscape elicit romantic
memories of fall.
()va a leaving by Laura Wleman
brings the viewer directly into the act of
creation through the evemhanging optical expressions on the rating of the ey t
It is an interesting extension of the 0p
art phenomenon. lies leaving, Roadside, which incorporated needs directly
into the fabric an extension of the collogeassemblage tradition, calls up, with
the aid ot warm browse, images at
landscape leaving, too seldom seen in
 
 
 
 
 
 
BUBA
An exhibit by
Lawrence Frank
East Street Gallery
New lol'u June 1.
Step Up To
JD'S RESIAURANI’
711% Main
Mon. s Sat. 5 to to p. .
Sunday — Noon to to pm,
an exhibition, is a valuable contribution
to this month’s Show.
The paintings of Richard service rep—
recent an aspect of the recent: trend or
shaped cam/asset. In his work Anguilla
the frame is set back about one half
inch from the surface of the canvas. A5
in most of percent’s work, form is sacrlilced to an exploration ot color effects.
financing and recording hues or pink
and blue present an interesting spatial
interface; while areas where one color
brands into another established unusual
coloislic effects. in his Pnerio Marquez
the canvas pumps a full six inches out
{lﬂm the Wall, million the blue form on
the front side are beautiful passes
variations of color. Form, a greater concern in this work, serves the function
of integrating the five surfaces of the
painting. The orange and core lines lead
the eye to the side surfaces where the
download movement of the links on the
left side draw the eye to the bottom surface where the blue strike offers a pleasant visual surprise.
The paintings of Robert McMillan,
largely monochromatic, have an alpha»
his on values and interface of forms, In
has Untitled acrylic in the east lobby,
McMillan explore nudist space and form
but introduces color to create further
spatial movements. The Work is more
dynamic, complex. and choosing than
his other paintingsi His pencil drawings
are printing, like little gets, complete
unto themselves.
The wine cups of Glenn le‘kde are examples or superior design and craftsmanship — to say more is difficult. The
machine has crest into Mr. circle‘s
work this year as shown in the cast
bronze lit—u McCormick meeting, 0rganlc Gear and Impossible Gear. The
walnut lifestyle Ferguson 1V is, in my
opinion, his best sculpture and possibly
the best work in the Show The subtle
modules walnut base gives the lime
stone a gentle life. The smooth, blowing
planes and lines or the lifestyle, constructed with the rough cut areas emphasizes the rock quality of the material
opposed by the beautiful biomorphio
form, No words can do justice to the
work
serve circle's jewelry exhibits superior craftsmanship. Her weed bottles
echo the forms of tall needs and are
strikingly beautiful. The large slab bottle in the center Cabinet in the railway
is educational. sensitive linear design
and a complex, well-resolved design
make this work the most beautiful pot
l‘ve seen at Grinnell,
To write about a good work at art is
difficult if not impossible: it Can't be
expressed in Words This exhibition is
the perfect example or the above state
ment. It is too good to be missed.
Page Nina
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
one}
(Photo by bill patterns
brand Blues Email
By PETER KEEPNEWS
When the mail himself, Bobby “Blue"
brand, pulled up in print ot party Gym
in his white Cadillac last Saturday
night, it was apparent that this was to
be no ordinary night at Grinnell. By the
time brand set root on the party stage,
the entire gym was adrian in a sea oi
soullulness, blnesiness, and the kind at
musical euphoria you seldom ﬁnd in
this part or town.
brand, the man who gave you such
hits as “Turn on Your Love Light’ and
“I city The Fool," put on quite a show.
It began when his band, Emie fields Jf.
and Company, played a heavy set ot
lucky jazz and soul numbers. Then a
beautiful young lady named roulette
Parker song and shorter her way into
the hearts and minds and bodies of the
audience, especially with her version or
“Twenty-ﬁve Miles to Go.” And then—
with the audience breathless with an:
occupation—Bobby brand walked up to
the stage, began to sing—and it )Ja:
beautifuli ’
brand's music is stopped in the [radio
tion or America’s only native art form,
the blues, and no words can do as good
a job as brand's performance did oi
explaining the universal appeal that tablets has. justice it to say that it you
missed the concert, you missed an op:
community to feel what it's like to be
really touched by the blues as song by
a master. Bobby brand really is a mas
(er a! his Craft (35 are his musician]
and Miss Parker), and it's quite some—
thing to have your soul started by a
master, This was soul. baby, and there’s
nothing more that can be said than that.
it you have to ask what it is, you’ll
never know.
This was a great concert, the kind of
evening that makes going to Grinnell
seem worthwhile. One thing that helped
make it such a success was the way
the gym was generated: it wash't. There
were no chairs on the floor and no crepepaper backdrop for the stage, and it was
great. It was the Fillmore Midwesth
people were tree to listen. dance, move
around, in short, to do their own thing
(a phrase i just intended). All that was
missing was a light Show. All Grinnell
concerts should be like this.
New This Year
EuroBUSpass in Europe—3 Weeks S88
As Well As Th
EuRA
Grinneil Tr
e Old Favorite,
Ilpass
avel Center
808 5th Avenue Court
Phone
236-4384
1364575
 
up. i...
4 Named ‘0attending’
donated D. russell, Thor johnson,
Bruce collins and morris Stubbs have
been selected for inclusion in the l9“
edition of "Outstanding College Athletes
of America."
russell, a lettermail in both football
and track, was twice helped all—Midwest. Conference honors in football and
was named Grinnell's most valuable
back in both 1966 and 1M6.
One of the most sensitive trackback in
Grinneli History, johnson, has scored
points in seVEn different individual
events as a pioneer—high jump, long
jump, triple jump, pole vault, high handles, inter-message handles, and low studies—and has also run on relay teams.
Also a yesterday in basketball, evening
scored 625 points to gain a spot among
Grillnell's top 15 career showers.
The six-took. seven-inch collins set
new school records in four lifestyle
yard, 60-yard, low-yard, and
, —last winter during the first
season or variety swimming. He also let-
tired last [all as all end on the Pioneer
innihall team.
"members
To liraiisili
Donald J. grant5lk, an allerdlvest
convergence football player and league
wrestling champion, was awarded the
David Theophilus. '51, trophy as Grin»
well College’s outstanding senior achieve
of 1968-1969, at the Honor “G” Letter—
men's bouquet Thursday, May a. The
Tlieophilus award winner is selected on
the basis oi performance, leadership,
and scholastic records.
Kraitsik is h threcsyear criterion in
both football and wrestling. and was
captain of both teams this year.
Kraitsik also received two other
awards — the Louis genius, ’42, award
for displaying exceptional courage and]
or desire to compete in athletics and the
Charles Walker, ’56, trophy as the most
valuable wrestler.
Named as recipient or the G. center
Duke, ’25, trophy as outstanding freshlnan achieve of 1968—69 was Charles W.
MCGrath, Jr. He set new Grinuell Imsh
records in the one», t\vo~, three-, and
four-mile runs as a member of Grinnell's
freshman cross country and track
teams, and also ran an the distance
wesley loursomc that gathered a new
trash record
A special award — an Honor G plane
get — was presented to James H.
Stauss, dean and protest oi the college.
The following awards were also presented at the bouquet:
Dick Uilr-ice, '33, trophy to the most
valuable football hack — to jonathan
D. Btlswell. a senior.
Dick Ullrich, ’33, trophy to the most
valuable football sitemap — to Robert
L villas. a senior.
John golden, ’53, trophy to the most
valuable cross country runner — to Eric
P, Jahn, a sophomore.
Dave junior, '51, trophy to the most
valuable basketball player — to Terry
A. followed, a junior.
Robert Ross. '53, trophy to the most
valuable sticker — to Bruce W. collins, a sophomore.
FINAL IN SOFTBALL STANDINGS:
N. counter . H Clam 54
ortCampus . in Cowlcs 45
Road . 7.2 liable . 1-;
East morris 54 Loose . . N
West morris . 5-4 barnes l4
SCARLET AND BLACK
Friday. my ti. lm
 
W
SPORTS
WWW
(Photo by Jim srorrn
GRINNELL third bahamas, Bill Grey. attempts to tag out a due runner
sterling third base.
Stickmeh stamp Siwasll
The Pioneer baseball team concluded
a rather visual season Monday on a
bright note as they trusted Knox is to
2 and 19 to 6 in a game rescheduled because of rain last Saturday. Grinncll
loitcd ten home runs out at the friendly
combines of powder Field in support at
Scott canyon and Sam Chandler. canyon contributed three round printers thing him for the final club leadership in
home runs with Roger joe who power
two hotels. Frank Dubach, completing
an incredible rapid recovery ham or se
here arm wound incurred earlier in the
season, had three home runs and finished the season cutting an unbelievable .5”. Roger monster also had two
your-banners. Rick Vranek and Bill
Gray continued their hot hitting at late
as they collected live and four hits effectively in the paintball.
This double victory left Grinnell third
in the ﬁnfl standings t the Midwest
conference's southern d on. The Pics
needs, 4 and 8 in the conference. wait
edges out by plymouth, 12 and a, and
Cornell. 9 and 3s Last Friday the Mom
mouth scott received quite a share as
the bloggers lost a heart-greater 10 to
8 despite a 12 hit attacks, Alter seven
and one-half ratings the Pioneers were
down 7 to 2 but two home runs by doc
and transit in the bottom oi the rights
brought the diamondmen back into the
game. in the north, Coach Boyd pulled
out all stops and replaced timing Phil
julie Wllh ace starter Scott canyon.
But canyon was no puzzle for the scott.
By the time Lee Arnetman could rescue
canyon and get the side out, the scott
had pushed across two more insurance
runs, These proved necessary as Grinnell replied in the bottom of the north.
Don Peterson sandwiched a walk be»
green hits by Arbetman and Gray, and
the Pioneers had the bases filled with
nc one out. But the heart of the Grinnell
betting order could only drive two runs
across. not enough to pull the game out.
starting kitchen Rich Weeks took the
loss. although he claimed his first
home run of the season,
Additions 0i Hirsch, six and Videtick
from the ireshman team will help
Boyd's batman next year. but these ads
options will be far outweighed by senior
losses. Pmspecls for next season will
depend heavily on the incoming ireshman bestsellers who, for the first time.
will be able lo play on the variety level.
Season’s End
sea ribreo her
ly KEN SCHOFIELD
The Grinnell newman ended their sex
son on n dlsappointing note last week.
end by shopping a heartbrcskcr to Carl:ton by u soon oi 5-4 on Friday and
than being bumper by a consistent 5t.
0law team in on Saturday. This dropped
their record to 57 overall and 54 in
conference play. The team. which it
composed oi a seniors, Grant Crandaii,
Doug Gilbertson and Phil cooper and
tour songs, Phil years, Jim Spell,
Chris naughty, and Ken Schoiield, was
much improved, over last year's team
which compiled a 1—9 record.
The best records oi the season went
to Spell and naughty who each compiled
excellent 8-4 records against still com<
petition.
The team travels to Beloil for the
conference Championships this weekend.
With Spell and naughty and the douglas
duo oi Schalield~naughty certain to be
needed. the team is looking lot at least
a third place finish.
As ice next year's team, the outlook
is even daughter as the 4 seasonal seniors will be joined by a talented group
or songs headed by Ed jesus and Car»
ids vendors.
;Grad Week
(Continued from Page 6)
night at which Susan Kaeser, Grant
Crandall. and Tom Tripleti will speak.
There will also be a ROTC announcement at 9:00 Friday morning ill the
North lounge. At this ceremony Curtis
and, lumre Assistant Secretary or Manpower for the Air Force who will also
receive an contrary Doctor at humans
Letters degree lmm the college later
in the afternoon. wildlife I speech.
Golf picture bloody
By JOHN WINTERSON
The Pioneer gold team probably went
through its longest season ever this
spring. For many or the matches Coach
powers could not even field a full lives
man squad. Plain old had luck struck
the Pioneers hard.
Bruce Peterson, last year's Number 1
man with the irish, and this spring, the
validity's Number 2 man, was forced
to leave the team because or a heavy
academic load which didn't allow him
enough time for practice. Paul Jacobs
son, a senior who (or the past two sensoils was in and out of the starting line.
up. could not participate this spring
because of a season long illness.
The team has solely missed Paul this
spring and are hoping he’ll recover in
time [or this weekend's conference meet.
Bill Gray, a senior, has performed
Well when in action this season, but has
only played in three matches due to
action with the baseball team, (Bill was
starting photoshop and hit .315 for the
Pioneer lollrrbziggers.)
And it those women’t enough profiles.
out oi the tour regulars on the team.
only Jollll thlersml had any variety
experience before [his year. Willtel'ski
has held down the number 1 Spot all
spring.
Bill Cllrclwn, a sophomore, has played number 2 man most of the spring
and has done comfortable well, Bill
posted a 76 this year against gotta State.
however, in a losing cause,
Kevin present and Ralph “Whitey"
christopher have founded out the squad
in the third and fourth positions.
The Pioneers were winners in their
eight ratings this spring. They lace Midwest conference Meet action in Beloll,
Wisconsin this afternoon and tomorrow.
ll Jacobson is in condition to play and
the others play up to their potential, a
responsible ﬁwish could still be in the
filing for Grinnell.
plymouth
Hy NORRIS STUBBS
Last Friday, johnson mysterious in the
high jump, in yes. high, and 440 intcrmcdiates, coupled with the springer
duo morris Stubbs and words Able to
lead the Pioneers to a 7540 edge over
powerful plymouth.
Both 44a and mile relay teams turned‘
in the best times at 44:6 and 3:201}.
Today and tomorrow the Pioneers win
be at Beluit competing in the Annual
Midwest Conference meet. Coach Obermiller believes that the team will give
a good showing — deep te the set-banks
encountered this season; not only has
there been an informal number of ins
series but the team. not having a home
track. has suffered greatly,
Thor Evensorl, a consistent performer
is covered to take the high jump.
springer morris Stubhs, who is having
the worst season in his career swing to
a pulled muscle and injured articles
london, has been sharing up in the past
week. Stubbs was chester out of ﬁrss
place in the 100 yd. dash two weeks ago
by present conference champion lesbian of Lawrence. Thue two will meet
again today and Stubbs is certain that
it will be a different story
Gordon Abel has had so far. A ﬁne
season. He has been showing persistent
ly good form in the low. zoo. and 400 yd,
Abel also rendered somewhat by circular trouble will Compete in the 22!) and
440 at the conference.
will Schooler is also looking good.- he
will make a bid at the 880 yd. run. Bill
has been In invaluable member at ball]
the MI] and mile relay tennis.
 
Friday, May is. I969
 
 
 
 
 
 
Photo by susan Kaeser
Black Further V. Charles Smith
partners Rap
Black another Deputy Minister or Defense, V. Charles Smith spoke here Sunday to a group of small but interested
students. First planned as a rally, and
filled as including a live rock band, the
event fell apart to some degree; the
rock band failed to show and the crowd
was small, But Smith felt that the
amount of feedback from his hour-long
talk had made the trip worthwhile.
The Black partners of Des points are
touring college computer in Iowa this
month to explain their politics and raise
money to require their Des points heads
quarters, which was recently destroyed
by a planned bomb.
SCARLET AND BLACK
Page Eleven
“It's What's Happening"
ly RICH WlCKSTRDM
Today, from 35 and 7:303:30 a happening, Crowds will be presented on
career Plaza and in Arena Theatre.
Since there is such vast misunderstanding about the form or a happening, perhaps a brief description is in order.
The happening grew, in part, out or
the use of college, Artists found it inadequate to be restricted to a two dimensional surface on which to attach
real objects of personal meaning. An
environment was created, willing an en
tire room with objects, light, and sound.
It was soon realized that visitors who
entered the Environment became a part
of it. They were given tasks to do.
Eventually people became objects —
their performance was the employment
of an idea. As such, no acting, artificial
programmes edition or movements, is
employed. The happening is composed
of compartmentalized, cosmetic units,
arranged in an clinical fashion. There
is no information transmitted from one
event to another. Although independently frequently enters the events, it is
carefully controlled by the artist. supervision never occurs in a true happening. Things do not just happen as
the world would lead one to believe.
Finally, the audienceparticipant barrier
of traditional theatre is broken down to
a greater or lesser extent. Visitors are
at times instructor to perform certain
tasks, thus involving them directly in
the action. To (IO—ordinary all of this admittedly complex action, a script is used
 
Sportswear
at the “IN" at counter’s Downstairs.
COUNTRY SET
COLLEGE TOWN
JOHN MEYER
MR. THOMSON
GARLAND
CATALINA
CATALINA JRS.
WHITE STAG
You’ve Never Seen So Much Fashion
In One Little store
@npmeyg ‘oil’l Ave. Positions, int.
GRINNELL'S COMPLETE STYLE SHOP FOR WOMEN
SOMETHING NEW EVERY DAY
Store Hours:
Noon 'Til 9 bondage: 9
"I'll 5 Tuesday thru Saturday
and most happenings are rehearsed Several times before production.
Last weekend an Activity (technically
different but related to a Happening)
was presented in Iowa City by Allan narrow. it took place in two parts. Part I
convicted of driving to Cedar stuff. Iowa,
by the banks of the Cedar River and
singing branches from the river as far
up the bank as we desired, We were
instructor we could dig in any manner
we wishes as long as it was done devotedly. A power showed performed the
same tasks as we did. These branches
were then allowed, the most mainstream
one first, by water carried from the
river in kitty tickets. We watched the
water ﬂow back to the river, then reviewed the tickets at the mouth of that
french and processed upstream to the
next one. This was repeated until every
french (about 7.0 in all) was allowed.
This completed Part 1.
Part II convicted of telling the world
about what we did in Part I. We were
to use any and every means of communication at our disposal. As such, the
preceding two paragraphs are part of
the activity at Iowa City which is the
only rationale for their inclusion in this
article.
Anyway, the happening In printer’l.
the project originally oi the Art Colloquium (now the project or partially new
students oi the Art consortium as
well as other interested students,
faculty members and organizations),
has been written to confirm as
closely as possible to an actual happening. The surgery used in the events,
although more instant than in most happenings, is aimed at problems and social
conditions which have been hunting us,
For example. a rock cocktail party will
be held in Arena theatre. People will be
given cups with cards attached. On these
cards will be lines; a question, an answer, and an explanation, one oi which
to be read at random to people you meet
who will respond with a line picked at
random from their card. in another
event, the world of “law enforcement"
will be experienced in a bicycle ride on
central camping Here come da judge.
One of the main goals of this venture
Is to involve as many people as possible
in activities which are both meaningful
and sun. In most of the events all spectators will become participants. Wear
a costume, bring a bicycle, or just walk
up: it will be removable, and, yes Grin.
well, :1 Valid intellectual endeavorr
.———E—.ﬁ
Senate beatles Finances
By TOM THOMAS
Money obligations have been the
prime order at business for the Senate
during the past two weeks. Topics oi
Consideration have included aid to the
claire benefit, legal fees for the playboy demonstration, and approval at the
annual budget.
Last Wednesday, the Senate voted to
allow $50 for legal defense of the “Grlnnell eight.” The motion, represented by
Senator Andy Loewi, was passed $3.
This week Senator reggae Graham and
Gina Mills asked that the Senate recognized their action. Miss Mills commented, “I don’t believe that it was a
decision representative of the student
body." She went on to state that “I pay
a $50 activity fee here and I don’t think
it should go to just eight people."
Tom Thomas responded that he felt
the issue concerned the entire college
campus. “The question here is
whether or not Richard Turner Ind
his reports can lntnlde on this cum—
put with the storm browser tactics
used in this case and get away
with it" Thomas also pointed out
that well over half the campus had
signed positions supporting the right
of the demonstration to protest,
whether or not they agreed with the
tactics used.
Senator Bill Thomas supported tale
former SGA president by remaining the
methods used by Turner‘s investigators
and containing the Senate that such pi-otedures could easily select many other
students on the campus. Alter extended
debate, the Senate, on a motion by Art
angeles, unanimously voted to i-eaiiirm
[be original allocation ivitli a rotation ot
medications of student support expressed
through positions.
The Senate also considered proposed
Cuts in the salaries of AWS and C of
HP treatments. C of HP President yes
ton opposed such a move on the grounds.
that “this is a value judgment of therefore that can only be made on the
basis Lil what others have done. I think
this is unlair. particularly when It was
assumed that the salary would remain
the same at the time we ran.” The Sen:
one voted to maintain the salaries at
the present level of £250. Similar dis.
session followed a proposal to increase
the salary of the Student Coordinator,
which was tables for former discussion.
In earlier action, the Senate admitted
$241 to the viagra benefit held last Saturday and donated 3100 to the italian
seller Fund. area Dungv. coordinator
at the event, reported that expenditureexceeded notifications, and an additional $55 were allocated for the Initiative
Fund.
in circulation next year's budget, the
Senate essentially followed closely the
lines at this year’s expenditures, The
Grinnell Draft Information Center, however, received no funds from SGA in
hopes that the organization will be supported hy the administration as a controlling service.
A new item In the budget, recommended by last real-s Finance Committee was the Public Events Fund.
In explaining the move, Finance
Committee chairman Andrew grill
said the fund would consultants the
many expenditures for public events
now being made by SGA ibm diverse
accounts. grill told the 5513 that the
fund was [or events that would not
fall under the jurisdiction of me
Initiative Fund or the Social coordination Committee.
SGA President new announced that
remaining vacancies on Studentrfaculty
Committees would be filled in the fall.
It was also reported that the Student
Affairs Committee had recommended
that students living out-campus next year
have the option of not paying board teen.
President suggest has not taken any he
tion as at yet.
DAN‘igid MAM EAEtEE'iY
The Finest In salaries
Usual and Unusual.
8T8 FOURTH AVENUE
 
SCARLET AND BLACK
Moves Made Toward Understanding
oy KATHY BULL
Things with town~college communicanon are changing right along. On May
1 some students and the people of the
principal Church discussed the Vietnam war and the changing policies of
the US. They agreed that students and
other citizens are responsible for bringing their opinions to the attention of policy makers. Father TarlCreti said that
most oi the people that attended felt it
was an anceuragingly healthy and helpful discussion and hope that there will
be more of them.
Henry Scheif, Bill Thomas, Mike
diesel, Rob Harlan. Mike brandon, Dave
llnlmans and Phil Saslch talked with
about 25 members of the First Baptist
Church on May 4. They began by reading a copy oi Ted Gilck's letter to his
draft board stating why he is resulting
the draft. After this, they hmke up into
groups of eight or nine, Henry Scheil
commented, “it was quite good. in general, they seemed to think more of college students and understand better
why click did it." Some of the topics
that were talked about in his group
were town-college relations, race, the
war, and resulting. Another group discussed the power of corporations and
reasons why there are some people who
reel so much more strongly about the
war than others and why people feel
allocated from government organizations. Bill Thomas, who was a member
of this group, felt that they were in
basic agreement about the War but felt
varying degrees of urgency. Many
people thought that simon could still do
something about it and that the talks
in Paris are not proceeding because the
North Vietnamese are instruction them.
Also on May 4, Tom Mill, Tony royal, Bill Parks, Carol batteries, Nick
pussy, Bruce Armstrong and Captain
Perdum discussed the Vietnam war,
distant and foreign policy with about
10 members oi the Presbyterian
Church. Afterwards. kodak commented
that although he would love to be an
optimize and think that We will get tD<
gender, he believes that the best way
to maintain safety is to isolate ourselves. improve our self-determination
and make ourselves tree. pussy said
that he realized that a compromise was
necessary to get the resolution to the
City Council. He feels it is necessary to
simply agree that the war is adjust and
not demand agreement on the procedures for ending it.
Mark browser, Bruce Balls, based
VanWagenen and Dr. suggest talked
with the Chamber of Commerce recently. Dr. suggest, a member of the Chamber of Commerce. introduced the stud
cents and spoke about the need for communication. The board members and
the students briefly discussed the war
and action that could be taken in the
town. At the Chamber oi Commerce
meeting last Wednesday they were going to consider whether they wanted to
talk further with students.
The high school student body president, Doug Kochneli, and some or his
friends and a group or college students
met a few weeks ago and decided on a
number or things they could do in the
high school about the war in Vietnam.
Andy Loewl, who talked with Kochneff,
has been trying to contact Kochneii to
ﬁnd out what, ii anything, has been
done; but he has been unable to reach
him.
Lynn Aldrich, Andy Loewl, Peter Keep.
news, David coleman and Lee chair
berg are on a committee that will meet
with Miss Georgia Dental the first week
oi school next year to establish a defining policy about high school attendance
at college events. Loewi says that some
college students have been upset by the
idea or high school students attending
events that they (college students) paid
for.
s—-———————————‘——ﬁ
winter Takes homes To Task
By KATHY KARLSON
No one questions the fact that the
comprehensive examinations at Grinnell vary from department to dependent in difficulty and in importance.
About three weeks ago, senior Bonnie
winter decided that she could not take
an examination she felt to be a meaningless test of her education. She distributed a statement to seniors. calling
for a meeting to discuss the justice at
comprehensive examinations. A few people showed up, but Miss winter was the
only senior who decided to refuse to
take the examination.
On April 26, she wrote 1 statement,
“Academic visual -— A comprehensive
Examination," during the time admitted
for her written examination which questioned the legitimate oi lodging a tour
year educational experience in two and
a half hours, During the time designated
for her oral comprehensive, she continued discussion of this statement, investing at that time that “I would not
answer questions that were part of an
oral examination, but that I would be
happy to talk to them about my positions on comes, or anything else they
carey to discuss as long as it was clear
that I was not taking an examination."
Unofficially notified that she had
founded her examinations, Miss winter
then petitioned the Committee on Academic Standing requesting that the requirement he waiver for the class of
1969. The committee unanimously recommended that the requirement not be
waiver, and on May 1, the Executive
Council unanimously declined to while
the requirement. Miss winter than joe
‘rated that the Executive Council hoax
her arguments against the examination.
she will meet with a sub-committee of
the Executive Council on Friday, May
16.
Miss winter assists that the examine<
tion is meaningless because it varies
ircm department to department, and
that it is destruction to the educational
process because “they make an individual dependent upon sitemap documents
for a good sell—Concept, thereby threatening his uniqueness."
“Colleges have caught themselves between two polls,” she said. “On the
one hand, they want to say that education is indeed more than, the storage
vi a given body oi information. on the
other hand, they want to continue to
apply quantitative measures which can
be transcripts into a publication judy.
men ."
Miss winter will request an individual
waiver from the requirement or will re.
quest that her letter written during the
time admitted for comm be counted as a
comprehensive examination.
m
) Existence
(Continued from Page 2)
Man ha: no tested right to interface
with ecology."
The other two candidates were more
lucclnct in their answers. One said, “I
try harder.” The other answered, “I am
installed by your existence.‘
A few other faculty members reduced the test unanswered, but ”wrote their
own" by saying, “It was stupid," and
“I would have filled it out if I had had
the time." The Executive Council will
decide whether or not to accept these
examinations.
THE FLAG POLE was the center at lemonade sales,
rrldry’ May it 1m,
Photo by Susan Kamiproceeds from which
were donated to the Playboy demonstration‘ legal fluid. The demonstration are
still packing 5515 at the necessary $1200 for legal services.
 
“Grinnell 8" Trial Set
The date of May 26 has been set [or
the trial of eight Grinnell students who
allegedly dlsrobed during a Feb. 5 Gates
Lounge lecture by a representative or
Playboy magazine, The students, who
are charged with “innocent exposure,"
will appear in Poweshiek County District Court in Montezuma.
Charges against a north student
were dropped at a preliminary hearing
in Grinnell on March 26.
innocent exposure is an indictable
misdemeanor under iowa law carrying
a penalty of set months’ infringement
or a $200 fine.
College advertiser
Anti-War Statement
By SOL BABEUF
Last Thursday, more than 800 student!
and faculty sponsored and endorsed I
statement appearing in the Grinncll
Herald-Register. The ad (approximate
cost—$140.00), was the product oi oi who.
moments rm to this campus: a joint
student - faculty - administration cooperative effort. The statement, which contained the war in Vietnam as neither
“necessary nor just," and called on
President simon to terminals this country’s involvement in SE. Asia "at
quickly as possible," was signed and
paid for by almost 98% of the faculty,
including Glen suggest and camel
Stauss.
The idea for the ad grew out of a dis<
session between suggest and about
twenty students on the day oi th ﬂan
ADDRESS HERE:
PTERO Probe Resumes a
Agents from the Iowa Attorney Gen. ,
eval 5 Office were in Grinnell again last 1
week to further investigate the activities ‘
oi Pterndactyl, still‘well’s underground
newspaper whose copy and photographs
were generally served by state agents at
a printing shop last March and were
recently returned to the owners after a
court inspection was issued. -
Assistant Attorney General Douglaﬂ: .
jackson and other agents visited with
at least nine Grinnell high school students and their parents to gather information about how Pterodactyl is austria- i
used to high School youth! Six of the
students questioned by the agents are
state members for The Beam, the
high school underground paper.
One at the students questioned last
week sold that the agents were also trying to determine if there was “a link"
between the two underground papers. He also said that alter being interview-“9
ed, the students were asked by (hi
agents to sign written statements based
on what they had told the agents. -,
The complicated issue of Ptemdacrﬁ
in currently being printed our of stat.
and should be ready for distribution
early next week, according to members of the paper's small,
22:: - 3
“incident," during which suggest wal
asked to take a stand ml the war (a lo
Calvin Plimpton). That evening, after
the generation or the Forum, suggest log
formed certain students that he would >
be willing to sign, as an individual, a
statement opposite the war. The noon]
bunch of student and faculty busybodiel
then pulled themselves with writing (in i
statement and producing signatures.
 
